Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 3 Severability

2-1-25.
Severability.

If any provision of §§

2-1-20

—

2-1-28

, or of any rule, regulation, or determination made under these sections, or the application of these sections to any person, agency, or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder
of §§

2-1-20

—

2-1-28

, or the rule, regulation, or determination, and the application of those provisions to other persons, agencies, or circumstances, shall not be affected. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section
or sections of §§ 2-1-20 — 2-1-28 shall not affect the validity of the remainder of §§ 2-1-20 — 2-1-28.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-1-25

; P.L. 1974, ch. 197, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 218, § 1.

2-1-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.
P.L. 1983, ch. 175, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 425, § 2, effective June 1, 1993.

2-1-27.
Access to information on freshwater wetland applications.

The directors of the department and the coastal resources management council shall establish procedures that will provide municipalities and the public with access to information concerning freshwater wetland permit applications filed with the state.
Procedures shall be designed to facilitate municipal input during the permit application review process and shall, to the extent feasible, utilize information technology to automate making information available in a timely manner.
Procedures to facilitate local input shall be established and implemented in a manner that avoids introducing delay in issuance of permit decisions.

History of Section.
P.L. 2015, ch. 218, § 2.

2-1-28.
Effect on zoning ordinances.

Local zoning ordinances and regulations that are inconsistent with this chapter shall be amended to conform to the requirements of §

45-24-30

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2015, ch. 218, § 2.